Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FORGOTTEN HEROES RANGES AND RETREAT.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Forgotten Heroes Ranges and Retreat, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip a new shooting range and retreat to accommodate handicapped individuals and disabled veterans. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end